Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 4
POLICE REGULATIONS

31-15-401. General police powers.

In relation to the general police power, the governing bodies of municipalities have the following powers:

To regulate the police of the municipality, including employing certified peace officers to enforce all laws of the state of Colorado notwithstanding section 16-2.5-201, and pass and enforce all necessary police ordinances;

To do all acts and make all regulations which may be necessary or expedient for the promotion of health or the suppression of disease;

To declare what is a nuisance and abate the same and to impose fines upon parties who may create or continue nuisances or suffer nuisances to exist; except that a municipal ordinance may impose liability on the owner of real property for a nuisance committed on the property by a tenant in lawful possession of the property only if the municipality notifies the property owner and tenant of the nuisance before a fine or other liability is imposed;

To provide for and compel the removal of weeds, brush, and rubbish of all kinds from lots and tracts of land within such municipalities and from the alleys behind and from the sidewalk areas in front of such property at such time, upon such notice, and in such manner as such municipalities prescribe by ordinance, and to assess the whole cost thereof, including five percent for inspection and other incidental costs in connection therewith, upon the lots and tracts of land from which the weeds, brush, and rubbish are removed. The assessment shall be a lien against each lot or tract of land until paid and shall have priority over all other liens except general taxes and prior special assessments.

In case such assessment is not paid within a reasonable time specified by ordinance, it may be certified by the clerk to the county treasurer who shall collect the assessment, together with a ten percent penalty for cost of collection, in the same manner as other taxes are collected. The laws of this state for assessment and collection of general taxes, including the laws for the sale and redemption of property for taxes, shall apply to the collection of such assessments.

To prevent and suppress riots, routs, affrays, noises, disturbances, and disorderly assemblies in any public or private place;

To prevent fighting, quarreling, dog fights, cock fights, and all disorderly conduct;

To suppress bawdy and disorderly houses and houses of ill fame or assignation within the limits of the municipality or within three miles beyond, except where the boundaries of two municipalities adjoin the outer boundaries of the municipality; to suppress gaming and gambling houses, lotteries, and fraudulent devices and practices for the purpose of gaining or obtaining money or property; and to regulate the promotion or wholesale promotion of obscene material and obscene performances, as defined in part 1 of article 7 of title 18, C.R.S.;

To restrain and punish loiterers, mendicants, and prostitutes;

To prohibit and punish for cruelty to animals;

To establish and erect jails, correction centers, and reform schools for the reformation and confinement of loiterers and disorderly persons and persons convicted of violating any municipal ordinance, to make rules and regulations for the government of the same, and to appoint necessary officers and assistants therefor;

To use the county jail for the confinement or punishment of offenders, subject to such conditions as are imposed by law, and with the consent of the board of county commissioners;

To authorize the acceptance of a bail bond when any person has been arrested for the violation of any ordinance and a continuance or postponement of trial is granted. When such bond is accepted, it shall have the same validity and effect as bail bonds provided for under the criminal statutes of this state.

To regulate and to prohibit the running at large and keeping of animals, including fowl, within the municipality and to otherwise provide for the regulation and control of such animals including, but not limited to, licensing, impoundment, and disposition of impounded animals.

In case any municipality neglects or refuses to pass an ordinance in conformity with this paragraph (m), anyone impounding an animal running at large within the limits of said municipality shall notify the state board of stock inspection commissioners, and said animal shall be disposed of by said board as provided in article 44 of title 35, C.R.S.

To regulate and license pawnbrokers as provided in section 29-11.9-102;

To enact and enforce ordinances prohibiting gambling and the use of any gambling device, as the terms are defined in section 18-10-102, in a park, on a public way, or on a street; except that in enacting and enforcing the ordinances, a municipality, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, may also prohibit social gambling in or on parks, public ways, or streets. Nothing in this subsection (1)(o) shall be construed as prohibiting pari-mutuel betting or wagering under article 32 of title 44.

To adopt reasonable regulations for the operation of establishments open to the public in which persons appear in a state of nudity for the purpose of entertaining the patrons of such establishment; except that such regulations shall not be tantamount to a complete prohibition of such operation. Such regulations may include the following:

Minimum age requirements for admittance to such establishments;

Limitations on the hours during which such establishments may be open for business; and

Restrictions on the location of such establishments with regard to schools, churches, and residential areas.

The governing body of the municipality may enact ordinances which provide that any establishment which engages in repeated or continuing violations of regulations adopted by the governing body shall constitute a public nuisance. In addition to the power provided for in paragraph (c) of this subsection (1) the governing body of the municipality may bring an action for an injunction against the operation of such establishment in a manner which violates such regulations.

Nothing in the regulations adopted by the governing body of the municipality pursuant to this paragraph (p) shall be construed to apply to the presentation, showing, or performance of any play, drama, ballet, or motion picture in any theater, concert hall, museum of fine arts, school, institution of higher education, or other similar establishment as a form of expression of opinion or communication of ideas or information, as differentiated from the promotion or exploitation of nudity for the purpose of advancing the economic welfare of a commercial or business enterprise.

To control and limit fires, including but not limited to the prohibition, banning, restriction, or other regulation of fires and the designation of places where fires are permitted, restricted, or prohibited.

Nothing in this paragraph (q) shall be construed to preempt or supercede state, tribal, or federal law concerning the control, limitation, or other regulation of fires described in this paragraph (q).

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1108, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 76:

(1)(g) amended, p. 559, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1)(g) amended, p. 985, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 82:

(1)(g) amended, p. 627, § 34, effective April 2.

L. 84:

(1)(o) added, p. 838, § 1, effective April 2; (1)(n) added, p. 443, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(1)(p) added, p. 1060, § 2, effective May 10.

L. 86:

(1)(g) amended, p. 784, § 7, effective April 21.

L. 2002, 3rd Ex. Sess.:

(1)(q) added, p. 38, § 4, effective July 17.

L. 2005:

(1)(c) amended, p. 550, § 1, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2017:

(1)(a) amended, (SB 17-066), ch. 105, p. 386, § 3, effective April 4; (1)(n) amended, (SB 17-228), ch. 246, p. 1042, § 8, effective August 9.

L. 2018:

(1)(o) amended, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 324, § 19, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

The provisions of this section are similar to provisions of several former sections as they existed prior to 1975. For a detailed comparison, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For requirement that a municipality be made a party in any proceeding involving the validity of an ordinance or franchise and that the attorney general be served with a copy in any proceeding involving the constitutionality of an ordinance or franchise, see § 13-51-115 and C.R.C.P. 57(j); for the authority of counties to adopt regulations pursuant to their police powers, see § 30-15-401; for the penalty for livestock grazing on roads and in municipalities, see § 35-46-105.

31-15-402. Liability for violation of nuisance ordinance.

If a municipality serves upon an owner and tenant of real property notice of a violation of a nuisance ordinance committed by a tenant on property that the owner rents or leases to a tenant, the owner shall have the right to deliver written notice to the tenant to abate the nuisance. If the tenant does not abate the nuisance within five days after delivery of the notice, the owner may enter the exterior area of the property and abate the nuisance.

This section shall not be construed to prohibit a property owner from entering any area of the property under the terms of the lease with the tenant.

If the abatement of a nuisance pursuant to this section requires the removal of a motor vehicle from the property, the property owner may abate the nuisance only by hiring a towing carrier, as defined in section 40-10.1-101, C.R.S., to take the vehicle to a lot for storage under appropriate protection.

Unless the lease provides otherwise, the tenant shall be liable to the owner of the real property for the amount of the owner's direct costs in abating a nuisance pursuant to this section and for the amount of the fine imposed upon the owner on and after the date on which the tenant received notice of the nuisance from the municipality pursuant to section 31-15-401 (1)(c).

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a tenant's legal remedies for harm caused by a property owner to the tenant's person or to the tenant's property other than the property that is the subject of an abatement pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 550, § 2, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2011:

(3) amended, (HB 11-1198), ch. 127, p. 418, § 10, effective August 10.

31-15-403. Prohibition against the use of restraints on pregnant women in custody.

A municipality that chooses to establish and operate a jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j), shall comply with the provisions of section 17-26-104.7, C.R.S., concerning the use of restraints on pregnant women in custody.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-193), ch. 312, p. 1468, § 5, effective January 1, 2011.

31-15-404. Menstrual hygiene products for a person in custody.

A municipality that chooses to establish and operate a jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j), shall comply with the provisions of section 17-26-104.3 concerning the provision of menstrual hygiene products to a person in custody at no expense to the person in custody.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1224), ch. 131, p. 589, § 6, effective April 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 19-1224, see section 1 of chapter 131, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

31-15-405. Opioid treatment for a person in custody.

A municipality that chooses to establish and operate a jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j), is strongly encouraged to comply with the provisions of section 17-26-104.9 concerning opioid treatment for a person in custody.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire section added, (HB 20-1017), ch. 288, p. 1424, § 4, effective September 14.

31-15-406. Incarceration of a person with the capacity for pregnancy.

A municipality that chooses to establish and operate a jail, as authorized in section 31-15-401 (1)(j), shall comply with the provisions of section 17-26-104.4 concerning the requirements of a facility that incarcerates persons who are capable of pregnancy.

Source:

L. 2021:

Entire section added, (SB 21-193), ch. 433, p. 2866, § 10, effective September 7.

31-15-407. Access to criminal history record information - illicit massage businesses - human trafficking - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "illicit massage business" means a business that may provide massage but engages in human trafficking-related offenses, as described in sections 18-3-503 and 18-3-504.

If acting under home rule authority, a municipality that adopts a resolution or ordinance to license a massage facility or prohibit activities to prevent the operation of illicit massage businesses that engage in human trafficking-related offenses, as described in section 30-15-401.4, the municipal police department shall conduct a background check on the applicant's or licensee's criminal history record and provide the municipality information to determine whether the applicant or licensee is approved or denied for a license based on the criminal history record information.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1300), ch. 439, p. 3092, § 2, effective August 10.